Maine, session 132, LD1844.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §1402, sub-§15 is enacted to read:
15. Reentry services. Within the limits of available resources, the commissioner shall
establish and maintain a reentry services program for residents of correctional facilities that
makes available, as appropriate, reentry services in the following areas:
A. Health and wellness, including, but not limited to, accessing available MaineCare
and veterans' benefits and connecting with community providers and other resources
for treating and managing substance use disorder and maintaining physical and mental
health;
B. Financial literacy and planning, including, but not limited to, information about
opening a bank account, managing a budget and building and maintaining credit;
C. Employment preparation, including, but not limited to, writing a resume, searching
for employment, information about obtaining a driver's license, information about
obtaining work-related certification or licensure and locating and securing housing;
D. Community and family integration, including, but not limited to, voter registration
information, information about services offered through the statewide 2-1-1 telephone
number designated pursuant to Title 35-A, section 7108 and connecting with
community support programs, including programs offering education on conflict
resolution, establishing and maintaining relationships and rejection management
techniques; and
E. Technology training, including, but not limited to, information about computer
literacy programs and avoiding Internet scams.
Page 1 - 132LR2212(03)